Missouri, session 2026, SB1234.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 537.767, to read as
follows:
537.767. 1. In any civil action for personal injury,
death, or property damage caused by a product, regardless of
the type of claims alleged or the theory of liability
asserted, the plaintiff shall prove, among other elements,
that the defendant designed, manufactured, sold, or leased
the particular product the use of which is alleged to have
caused the injury on which the claim is based, and not a
similar or equivalent product. Designers, manufacturers,
sellers, or lessors of products not identified as having
been used, ingested, or encountered by an allegedly injured
party shall not be held liable for any alleged injury. A
person, firm, corporation, association, partnership, or
other legal or business entity whose design is copied or
otherwise used by a manufacturer without the designer's
express authorization shall not be subject to liability for
personal injury, death, or property damage caused by the
manufacturer's product, even if the use of the design was
foreseeable.

SB 1234 2
2. This section shall not alter or affect any other
provision of law, including those provisions relating to
mislabeling, fraud, and deceptive merchandising practices
and those provisions that apply to successor entities,
distributors, component manufacturers, or manufacturers who
use component parts in assembling products for sale as
complete units or those provisions that apply to the
operation of a contract, including a licensing agreement.
✓